Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2955HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 1007 Section 1. Section 602.8106, subsection 4, paragraph b, 1 Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The fine amount for a violation that occurred within the 3 boundaries of the county shall be distributed as follows: 4 (1) Ninety-one Eighty-five percent to the state court 5 administrator. 6 (2) Nine Eight percent to the county treasurer for deposit 7 in the county general fund where the violation occurred. 8 (3) Seven percent to the victim restitution fund 9 established in section 915.96. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 915.96 Victim restitution fund. 11 A victim restitution fund is established as a separate 12 fund in the state treasury. Moneys deposited in the fund 13 shall be administered by the department and dedicated to 14 and used for the purposes of section 910.1, subsection 6, 15 and for restitution for the death of a victim under section 16 910.3B. The fund shall consist of moneys deposited into the 17 fund pursuant to section 602.8106, subsection 4, paragraph 18 âbâ , subparagraph (3), and appropriations made to the fund. 19 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain 20 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 21 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 22 purposes designated. 23